District of Columbia statutes.
47-1068

Appalachian State University, lot 42 in square 871.

The property located in the Southeast quadrant of the District of Columbia and described as lot 42 in square 871, comprising land located adjacent to North Carolina Avenue, S.E., together with the improvements thereon and owned by The Board of Trustees of the Endowment Fund of Appalachian State University, shall be exempt from all taxation so long as it is owned by The Board of Trustees of the Endowment Fund of Appalachian State University and planned for use by the Appalachian State University for its purposes and activities, and is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1202(b), 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1202(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle Y of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1201 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle Y of title I of the act may be cited as the Appalachian State University Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Act of 2005.